src/fst/morphology/affixes/possessorindices.lexc
!! Possessor indices

!! The Erzya language possessor indices or possessive suffixes may be followed
!! by a number of morpheme types


LEXICON PossPX1
:%> PossMarker-then-Clt ;

LEXICON N_KIN-TYPE-PX-GEN-SG1-SG2
!2022-04-07 N_KIN-TYPE-PX-GEN-SG1 ;
 N_KIN-TYPE-PX-GEN-SG2	;
!LEXICON N_KIN-TYPE-PX-GEN-SG1
!+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}нь K ;
LEXICON N_KIN-TYPE-PX-GEN-SG2
+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}ть K ;

! PossMarker-followed-by-K-possibility
LEXICON PossMarker-then-Clt
!2019-03-29 why is the %> missing?
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Use/SpellNoSugg+Use/NG+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%{оеэØ%}м K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%{оеэØ%}нза K ;
@U.PossPx.Pl1@+PxPl1:@U.PossPx.Pl1@%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к K-lak ;
@U.PossPx.Pl2@+PxPl2:@U.PossPx.Pl2@%{оеэØ%}нк K-lak ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%{оеэØ%}ст K ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/SE+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%{оеэØ%}ск K-lak ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/SE+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%{оеэØ%}ске K ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%{оеэØ%}нст K ;

LEXICON _OSH-PossPX1
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%}  SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Dial/SE+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}м  SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%}  SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%}  SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%}  SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%}  SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%}  SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Pl1@+PxPl1:@U.PossPx.Pl1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к  SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Pl2@+PxPl2:@U.PossPx.Pl2@%>%{оеэØ%}нк  SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}ст  SecondaryDeclination ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}нст  SecondaryDeclination ;



!LEXICON POSSX4-END-FOC-CLT/COP-SC3
!! These are possessor indices that can be followed by predicate marking
!! in the present there is no destinction between ScSg3 and ScPl3
!! Possessor indices allowing (1) #, (2) Foc, (3) Der/Pr ()
!!
!OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;

!LEXICON POSSX4-END !!= * __@CODE@__ Word final possessor index, no subsequent clitic
!!! _KUDO-Possessive-Word-Final
!OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;

!LEXICON POSSX4-END-DAT
!+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} ENDLEX ;
!+PxSg1+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/SE:%>%{оеэØ%}м ENDLEX ;
!+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} ENDLEX ;
!+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W:%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} ENDLEX ;
!+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;
!+PxPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к ENDLEX ;
!+PxPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}нк ENDLEX ;
!+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}ст ENDLEX ;
!+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}нст ENDLEX ;
!!! Used with words like тензэ

LEXICON N-KIN
!! This appears with kindred terminology 
+Sem/Hum+Sem/Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}ть N2Dem-SE ;
+Sem/Hum+Sem/Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}ть%> N2Dem-SE ; ! _ь_ retension through double %>%>
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sem/Hum+Sem/Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}ть _KIT-Conjugation ;
!2022-04-01+Sem/Hum+Sem/Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}нь OBL-WITH-COP_KAL ;
!+Sem/Hum+Sem/Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}нь _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;
+Sem/Hum+Sem/Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}ть OBL-WITH-COP_KAL ;
!+Sem/Hum+Sem/Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}ть _KIT-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON N_KAL-Derivation-WITH-POSSX
!! Is "_KAL" necessary ?
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а%>нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>шка%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;!CHECKME 2022-04-10
+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1%>нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;

+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нд%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нд%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а%>нд%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>нд%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1%>нд%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;

+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>ндз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>ндз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а%>ндз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>ндз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1%>ндз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;

!2023_03_10+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а%>н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1%>н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
!2023_03_10+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нк _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нк _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а%>нк _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>нк _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1%>нк _LAK-N2-Def-Declension ;
!2023_03_10+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>ст _KIT-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>ст _KIT-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а%>ст _KIT-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>ст _KIT-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1%>ст _KIT-N2-Def-Declension ;

+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м N2Dem-SE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W:%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к N2Dem-SE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}нк N2Dem-SE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}ст N2Dem-SE ;

LEXICON POSSX-MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION_OR_POSSX-OBL4-N2DEM-SE
 OBL-PX4-CLTCOP ;
 POSSX-OBL4-N2DEM-SE ;

!LEXICON POSSX-MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION
!+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
!+PxSg1+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/SE:%>%{оеэØ%}м MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
!+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
!+Use/-Spell+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W:%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
!+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
!+PxPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
!+PxPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}нк MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
!+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}ст MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;

LEXICON POSSX-OBL4-N2DEM-SE
+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg+Dial/SE:%>%{оеэØ%}м N2Dem-SE ;
+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+Use/-Spell+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W:%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+PxPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к N2Dem-SE ;
+PxPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}нк N2Dem-SE ;
+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}ст N2Dem-SE ;


LEXICON DAT-PX
 DAT-PXSG1 ;
 DAT-PXSG2 ;
 DAT-PXSG3 ;
!! DAT-PXPL1 ;
 DAT-PXPL2 ;
 DAT-PXPL3 ;

LEXICON DAT-PXSG1
+SP+Dat+PxSg1:%>нень K ;

LEXICON DAT-PXSG2
+SP+Dat+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}тень K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Dat+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}теть K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/SE+Dat+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}те K ;

LEXICON DAT-PXSG3
@U.DECL-NX.SP@+SP+Dat+PxSP3:@U.DECL-NX.SP@%>%{оеэØ%}нстэнь K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Dat+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нстэ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/SE+Dat+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нст%{оэØ%} K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+Dat+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нстэнзэ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+Dat+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нстэндэ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+Dat+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нстэндзэ K ;

!!LEXICON DAT-PXPL1

LEXICON DAT-PXPL2
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+SP+Dat+PxPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}нстэнк K-lak ;

LEXICON DAT-PXPL3
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+SP+Dat+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}нстэнь K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/SE+Dat+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}нст%{оэØ%} K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+Dat+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}нстэнст K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+Dat+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}нстэст K ;


LEXICON SG-GEN-PX
 SG-GEN-PXSG1 ;
 SG-GEN-PXSG2 ;
 SG-GEN-PXSG3 ;
 SG-GEN-PXPL1 ;
 SG-GEN-PXPL2 ;
 SG-GEN-PXPL3 ;

LEXICON SG-GEN-PXSG1
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}м MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;

LEXICON SG-GEN-PXSG2
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;

LEXICON SG-GEN-PXSG3
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Sem/Inanim+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}з%{оэØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;

LEXICON SG-GEN-PXPL1
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
!@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/Cop+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к K ;

LEXICON SG-GEN-PXPL2
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}нк MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
!@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/Cop+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}нк K-lak ;

LEXICON SG-GEN-PXPL3
@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}ст MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
!@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Sg+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/Cop+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}ст K ;


LEXICON SG-NOM-PX
 SG-NOM-PXSG1 ;
 SG-NOM-PXSG2 ;
 SG-NOM-PXSG3 ;
 SG-NOM-PXPL1 ;
 SG-NOM-PXPL2 ;
 SG-NOM-PXPL3 ;

LEXICON SG-NOM-PXSG1
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-NomSg-Conjugation ;
LEXICON SG-NOM-PXSG2
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-NomSg-Conjugation ;
LEXICON SG-NOM-PXSG3
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@%>%{оеэØ%}з%{оэØ%} _KUDO-NomSg-Conjugation ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@%>%{оеэØ%}з%{оэØ%} K ;
